District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1103.01

Office of Director of Campaign Finance established; enforcement of chapter.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 454, Pub. L. 93-376, title III, § 301
Jan. 3, 1975, 88 Stat. 2177, Pub. L. 93-635, § 12
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101,§ 3, 25 DCR 257
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(w), 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(d), (p), (r), 29 DCR 458
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-17, § 6, 30 DCR 3196
April 5, 2000, D.C. Law 13-79, § 2(b), 46 DCR 10460
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862

History

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 1-1431.
1973 Ed., § 1-1151.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of District of Columbia Campaign Finance Reform and Conflict of Interest Act of 1974 Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-22, June 17, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 3236).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of District of Columbia Campaign Finance Reform and Conflict of Interest Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-51, September 22, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 5510).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).

Emergency Legislation